California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(b) Parties to a transaction may agree upon the money to be used in a transaction giving rise to a foreign-money claim and may agree to use different moneys for different aspects of the transaction. Stating the price in a foreign money for one aspect of a transaction does not alone require the use of that money for other aspects of the transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 932, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

676.4.

(a) The money in which the parties to a transaction have agreed that payment is to be made is the proper money of the claim for payment. 

(b) If the parties to a transaction have not otherwise agreed, the proper money of the claim, as in each case may be appropriate, is one of the following: 

(1) The money regularly used between the parties as a matter of usage or course of dealing. 

(2) The money used at the time of a transaction in
 international trade, by trade usage or common practice, for valuing or settling transactions in the particular commodity or service involved. 

(3) The money in which the loss was ultimately felt or will be incurred by the party claimant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 932, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

676.5.

(a) If an amount contracted to be paid in a foreign money is measured by a specified amount of a different money, the amount to be paid is determined on the conversion date. 

(b) If an amount contracted to be paid in a foreign money is to be measured by a different money at the rate of exchange prevailing on a date before default, that rate of exchange applies only to payments made within a reasonable time after default, not exceeding 30 days. Thereafter, conversion is made at the bank-offered spot rate on the conversion date. 

(c) A monetary claim is neither usurious nor unconscionable because the agreement on which it is based provides that the amount of the debtor’s obligation to be paid in the debtor’s money, when received by the creditor, shall equal a specified amount of the foreign money of the country of the creditor. If, because of unexcused delay in payment of a judgment or award, the amount received by the creditor does not equal the amount of the foreign money specified in the agreement, the court or arbitrator shall amend the judgment or award accordingly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 932, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

676.6.

(a) A person may assert a claim in a specified foreign money. If a foreign-money claim is not asserted, the claimant makes the claim in United States dollars. 

(b) An opposing party may allege and prove that a claim, in whole or in part, is in a different money than that asserted by the claimant. 

(c) A person may assert a defense, setoff, recoupment, or counterclaim in any money without regard to the money of other claims. 

(d) The
 determination of the proper money of the claim is a question of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 932, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

676.7.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a judgment or award on a foreign-money claim shall be stated in an amount of the money of the claim. 

(b) A judgment or award on a foreign-money claim is payable in that foreign money or, at the option of the debtor, in the amount of United States dollars which will purchase that foreign money on the conversion date at a bank-offered spot rate. 

(c) Assessed costs shall be entered in United States dollars. 

(d) Each payment in United States dollars shall be accepted and credited on a judgment or award on a foreign-money claim in the amount of the foreign money that could be purchased by the dollars at a bank-offered spot rate of exchange at or near the close of business on the conversion date for that payment. 

(e) A judgment or award made in an action or distribution proceeding on both (1) a defense, setoff, recoupment, or counterclaim and (2) the adverse party’s claim, shall be netted by converting the money of the smaller into the money of the larger, and by subtracting the smaller from the larger, and specify the rates of exchange used. 

(f) A judgment substantially in the following form complies with subdivision (a): 

“IT IS ADJUDGED AND ORDERED, that Defendant (insert name) pay to
 Plaintiff (insert name) the sum of (insert amount in the foreign money) plus interest on that sum at the rate of (insert rate--see Section 676.9) percent a year or, at the option of the judgment debtor, the number of United States dollars which will purchase the (insert name of foreign money) with interest due, at a bank-offered spot rate at or near the close of business on the banking day next before the day of payment, together with assessed costs of (insert amount) United States dollars.‛

(g) If a contract claim is of the type covered by subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 676.5, the judgment or award shall be entered for the amount of money stated to measure the obligation to be paid in the money specified for payment or, at the option of
 the debtor, the number of United States dollars which will purchase the computed amount of the money of payment on the conversion date at a bank-offered spot rate. 

(h) A judgment shall be entered in foreign money in the same manner, and has the same effect as a lien, as other judgments. It may be discharged by payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 932, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

676.8.

The rate of exchange prevailing at or near the close of business on the day the distribution proceeding is initiated governs all exchanges of foreign money in a distribution proceeding. A foreign-money claimant in a distribution proceeding shall assert its claim in the named foreign money and show the amount of United States dollars resulting from a conversion as of the date the proceeding was initiated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 932, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

676.9.

(a) With respect to a foreign-money claim, recovery of prejudgment or pre-award interest and the rate of interest to be applied in the action or distribution proceeding, except as provided in subdivision (b), are matters of the substantive law governing the right to recovery under the conflict-of-laws rules of this state. 

(b) The court or arbitrator shall increase or decrease the amount of prejudgment or pre-award interest otherwise payable in a judgment or award in foreign money to the extent required by the law of this state governing a failure to make or accept an
 offer of settlement or offer of judgment, or conduct by a party or its attorney causing undue delay or expense. 

(c) A judgment or award on a foreign-money claim bears interest at the rate applicable to judgments of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 932, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

676.10.

(a) If an action is brought to enforce a judgment of another jurisdiction expressed in a foreign money and the judgment is recognized in this state as enforceable, the enforcing judgment shall be entered as provided in Section 676.7, whether or not the foreign judgment confers an option to pay in an equivalent amount of United States dollars. 

(b) A foreign judgment may be enforced in accordance with Title 11 (commencing with Section 1710.10) of Part 3. 

(c) A satisfaction or partial payment made upon the
 foreign judgment, on proof thereof, shall be credited against the amount of foreign money specified in the judgment, notwithstanding the entry of judgment in this state. 

(d) A judgment entered on a foreign-money claim only in United States dollars in another state shall be enforced in this state in United States dollars only.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 932, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

676.11.

(a) Computations under this section are for the limited purposes of the section and do not affect computation of the United States dollar equivalent of the money of the judgment for the purpose of payment. 

(b) For the limited purpose of facilitating the enforcement of provisional remedies in an action, the value in United States dollars of assets to be seized or restrained pursuant to a writ of attachment, garnishment, execution, or other legal process, the amount of United States dollars at issue for assessing costs, or the amount of United States dollars involved for
 a surety bond or other court-required undertaking, shall be ascertained as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d). 

(c) A party seeking process, costs, bond, or other undertaking under subdivision (b) shall compute in United States dollars the amount of the foreign money claimed from a bank-offered spot rate prevailing at or near the close of business on the banking day next preceding the filing of a request or application for the issuance of process or for the determination of costs, or an application for a bond or other court-required undertaking. 

(d) A party seeking the process, costs, bond, or other undertaking under subdivision (b) shall file with each request or application an affidavit or certificate executed in good faith by its counsel or a bank officer, stating the market quotation used and how it was obtained, and setting forth the calculation. Affected court officials
 incur no liability, after a filing of the affidavit or certificate, for acting as if the judgment were in the amount of United States dollars stated in the affidavit or certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 932, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

676.12.

(a) If, after an obligation is expressed or a loss is incurred in a foreign money, the country issuing or adopting that money substitutes a new money in place of that money, the obligation or the loss is treated as if expressed or incurred in the new money at the rate of conversion the issuing country establishes for the payment of like obligations or losses denominated in the former money. 

(b) If substitution under subdivision (a) occurs after a judgment or award is entered on a foreign-money claim, the court or arbitrator shall amend the judgment or award by a like
 conversion of the former money.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 932, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

676.13.

Unless displaced by particular provisions of this title, the principles of law and equity, including the law merchant, and the law relative to capacity to contract, principal and agent, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, bankruptcy, or other validating or invalidating causes supplement its provisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 932, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

676.14.

This title shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this title among states enacting it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 932, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

676.15.

If any provision of this title or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, that invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this title which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this title are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 932, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

676.16.

This title applies to actions and distribution proceedings commenced on or after January 1, 1992.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 932, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 9. ENFORCEMENT OF JUDGMENTS [680.010. - 724.260.]



  DIVISION 1. DEFINITIONS AND GENERAL PROVISIONS [680.010. - 694.090.]



  CHAPTER 1. Short Title and Definitions [680.010. - 680.380.]

680.010.

This title shall be known and may be cited as the Enforcement of Judgments Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

680.110.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

680.120.

“Account debtor” means “account debtor” as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 15.5.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

680.130.

“Account receivable” means “account” as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

680.135.

“Affidavit of Identity” means an affidavit or declaration executed by a judgment creditor, under penalty of perjury, that is filed with the clerk of the court in which the judgment is entered at the time the judgment creditor files for a writ of execution or an abstract of judgment. The affidavit of identity shall set forth the case name and number, the name of the judgment debtor stated in the judgment, the additional name or names by which the judgment debtor is known, and the facts upon which the judgment creditor has relied in obtaining the judgment
debtor’s additional name or names. The affidavit of identity shall not include the name or names of persons, including any corporations, partnerships, or any legal entities not separately named in the judgment in which the judgment debtor is a partner, shareholder, or member, other than the judgment debtor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 639, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

680.140.

“Chattel paper” means “chattel paper” as defined in paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 16.1.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

680.145.

“Child support” includes family support.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 161 of Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

680.150.

“Costs” means costs and disbursements, including but not limited to statutory fees, charges, commissions, and expenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

680.160.

“Court” means the court where the judgment sought to be enforced was entered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

680.170.

“Deposit account” means “deposit account” as defined in paragraph (29) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 16.2.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

680.180.

“Document of title” means “document” as defined in paragraph (30) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code. A document of title is negotiable if it is negotiable within the meaning of Section 7104 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 16.3.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

680.190.

“Equity” means the fair market value of the interest of the judgment debtor in property, or in the case of community property the fair market value of the interest of the judgment debtor and the spouse of the judgment debtor in the property, over and above all liens and encumbrances on the interest superior to the judgment creditor’s lien.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

680.200.

“Financial institution” means a state or national bank, state or federal savings and loan association or credit union, or like organization, and includes a corporation engaged in a safe deposit business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

680.210.

“General intangibles” means “general intangibles,” as defined in paragraph (42) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code, consisting of rights to payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

680.220.

“Instrument” means “instrument”, as defined in paragraph (47) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 17.1.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

680.230.

“Judgment” means a judgment, order, or decree entered in a court of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

680.240.

“Judgment creditor” means the person in whose favor a judgment is rendered or, if there is an assignee of record, means the assignee of record. Unless the context otherwise requires, the term also includes the guardian or conservator of the estate, personal representative, or other successor in interest of the judgment creditor or assignee of record.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

680.250.

“Judgment debtor” means the person against whom a judgment is rendered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

680.260.

“Levying officer” means the sheriff or marshal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

680.270.

“Money judgment” means that part of a judgment that requires the payment of money.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

680.280.

“Person” includes a natural person, a corporation, a partnership or other unincorporated association, a general partner of a partnership, a limited liability company, and a public entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 60.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

680.290.

“Personal property” includes both tangible and intangible personal property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

680.300.

“Principal amount of the judgment” means the total amount of the judgment as entered or as last renewed, together with the costs thereafter added to the judgment pursuant to Section 685.090, reduced by any partial satisfactions of such amount and costs and by any amounts no longer enforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

680.310.

“Property” includes real and personal property and any interest therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

680.320.

“Real property” includes any right in real property, including but not limited to a leasehold interest in real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

680.330.

“Registered process server” means a person registered as a process server pursuant to Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 22350) of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

680.340.

“Secured party” means “secured party” as defined in paragraph (73) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 531, Sec. 4.   (AB 502)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Operative July 1, 2014, by Sec. 28 of Ch. 531.)
-------------------------------------------

680.345.

“Security” means a “security” as defined in Section 8102 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

680.350.

“Security agreement” means “security agreement” as defined in paragraph (74) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 531, Sec. 5.   (AB 502)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Operative July 1, 2014, by Sec. 28 of Ch. 531.)
-------------------------------------------

680.360.

“Security interest” means “security interest” as defined in Section 1201 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

680.365.

“Spousal support” includes support for a former spouse.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

680.370.

“Tangible personal property” includes chattel paper, documents of title, instruments, securities, and money.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

680.380.

“Writ” includes a writ of execution, a writ of possession of personal property, a writ of possession of real property, and a writ of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. General Provisions [681.010. - 681.050.]

681.010.

Except as otherwise provided by statute:

(a) A money judgment is enforceable as provided in Division 2 (commencing with Section 695.010).

(b) A judgment for possession of personal property is enforceable as provided in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 714.010) of Division 3.

(c) A judgment for possession of real property is enforceable as provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 715.010) of Division 3.

(d) A judgment for sale of real or personal property is enforceable as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 716.010) of Division 3.

(e) A judgment requiring performance of an act not described in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, or requiring forbearance from performing an act, is enforceable as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 717.010) of Division 3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

681.020.

An assignee of a judgment is not entitled to enforce the judgment under this title unless an acknowledgment of assignment of judgment to that assignee has been filed or the assignee has otherwise become an assignee of record under Section 673.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 36, Sec. 23.   (AB 3364)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

681.030.

(a) The Judicial Council may provide by rule for the practice and procedure in proceedings under this title.

(b) The Judicial Council may prescribe the form of the applications, notices, orders, writs, and other papers to be used under this title. The Judicial Council may prescribe forms in languages other than English. The timely completion and return of a Judicial Council form prescribed in a language other than English has the same force and effect as the timely completion and return of an English language form.

(c) The Judicial Council shall prepare a form containing all of the following:

(1) A list of each of the federal and this state’s exemptions from enforcement of a money judgment against a natural person.

(2) A citation to the relevant statute of the United States or this state which creates each of the exemptions.

(3) Information on how to obtain the list of exemption amounts published pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 703.150.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 19.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

681.035.

The California Law Revision Commission is authorized to maintain a continuing review of and submit recommendations to the Governor and the Legislature concerning enforcement of judgments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 15, Sec. 1.   (AB 567)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

681.040.

If a paper is required or permitted to be filed with a levying officer under this title, the paper is considered filed when it is actually received by the levying officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

681.050.

If any provision or clause of this title or application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this title which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this title are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Period for Enforcement and Renewal of Judgments [683.010. - 683.320.]



  ARTICLE 1. Period for Enforcement of Judgments [683.010. - 683.050.]

683.010.

Except as otherwise provided by statute or in the judgment, a judgment is enforceable under this title upon entry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

683.020.

Except as otherwise provided by statute, upon the expiration of 10 years after the date of entry of a money judgment or a judgment for possession or sale of property:

(a) The judgment may not be enforced.

(b) All enforcement procedures pursuant to the judgment or to a writ or order issued pursuant to the judgment shall cease.

(c) Any lien created by an enforcement procedure pursuant to the judgment is extinguished.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

683.030.

If a money judgment is payable in installments, the 10-year period of enforceability prescribed by Section 683.020 runs as to each installment from the date the installment becomes due and runs as to costs from the date the costs are added to the judgment pursuant to Section 685.090.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

683.040.

If the judgment creditor applies for a writ for the enforcement of a judgment and the application is made more than 10 years after the date the judgment was entered or renewed, the application shall be accompanied by an affidavit of a person having knowledge of the facts stating facts showing that the issuance of the writ sought in the application is not barred under this chapter. A copy of the affidavit shall be attached to the writ when issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

683.050.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), nothing in this chapter limits any right the judgment creditor may have to bring an action on a judgment, but any such action shall be commenced within the period prescribed by Section 337.5.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), no action on a judgment may be brought on a judgment identified in subdivision (c) of Section 683.110.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 883, Sec. 1.   (SB 1200)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Renewal of Judgments [683.110. - 683.220.]

683.110.

(a) The period of enforceability of a money judgment or a judgment for possession or sale of property may be extended by renewal of the judgment as provided in this article.

(b) A judgment shall not be renewed under this article if the application for renewal is filed within five years from the time the judgment was previously renewed under this article.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a judgment creditor may renew the period of enforceability of the following types of money judgments only once pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 683.120:

(1) A judgment on a claim related to medical expenses if the principal amount of the money
 judgment remaining unsatisfied against a debtor is under two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000).

(2) A judgment on a claim related to personal debt if the principal amount of the money judgment remaining unsatisfied against a debtor is under fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Debtor” means a natural person from whom money is due or owing or alleged to be due or owing.

(2) “Due or owing” does not include debts incurred due to or obtained by tortious or fraudulent conduct or judgments for unpaid wages, damages, or penalties owed to an employee.

(3) “Personal debt” means money due or owing or alleged to be due or owing
 from a natural person arising out of a transaction in which the money, property, insurance, or services which are the subject of the transaction are primarily for the debtor’s personal, family, or household purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 20.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

683.120.

(a) The judgment creditor may renew a judgment by filing an application for renewal of the judgment with the court in which the judgment was entered.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this article, the filing of the application renews the judgment in the amount determined under Section 683.150 and extends the period of enforceability of the judgment as renewed for a period of 10 years from the date the application is filed.

(c) Notwithstanding
 subdivisions (a) and (b), for a judgment identified in subdivision (c) of Section 683.110, a judgment creditor may renew the judgment only once. The filing of the application under this subdivision renews the judgment in the amount determined under Section 683.150 and extends the period of enforceability of the judgment as renewed for a period of five years from the date the application is filed. No application may be filed if the judgment was renewed on or before December 31, 2022.

(d) In the case of a money judgment payable in installments, for the purposes of enforcement and of any later renewal, the amount of the judgment as renewed shall be treated as a lump-sum money judgment entered on the date the application is
 filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 883, Sec. 3.   (SB 1200)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

683.130.

(a) In the case of a lump-sum money judgment or a judgment for possession or sale of property, the application for renewal of the judgment may be filed at any time before the expiration of the 10-year period of enforceability provided by Section 683.020 or, if the judgment is a renewed judgment, at any time before the expiration of the 10-year period of enforceability of the renewed judgment provided by Section 683.120.

(b) In the case of a money judgment payable in
 installments, the application for renewal of the judgment may be filed:

(1) If the judgment has not previously been renewed, at any time as to past due amounts that at the time of filing are not barred by the expiration of the 10-year period of enforceability provided by Sections 683.020 and 683.030.

(2) If the judgment has previously been renewed, within the time specified by subdivision (a) as to the amount of the judgment as previously renewed and, as to any past due amounts that became due and payable after the previous renewal, at any time before the expiration of the 10-year period of enforceability provided by Sections 683.020 and 683.030.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 4.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

683.140.

The application for renewal of the judgment shall be executed under oath and shall include all of the following:

(a) The title of the court where the judgment is entered and the cause and number of the action.

(b) The date of entry of the judgment and of any renewals of the judgment and where
 entered in the records of the court.

(c) The name and address of the judgment creditor and the name and last known address of the judgment debtor. However, the judgment creditor shall omit the name of a judgment debtor from the application for a writ of execution if the liability of that judgment debtor has ceased with regard to the judgment, including either of the following occurrences:

(1) The judgment debtor has obtained a discharge of the judgment pursuant to Title 11 of the United States Code and notice thereof has been filed with the court.

(2) The judgment creditor files an acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment with regard to the judgment debtor pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 724.010) of Division 5.

(d) In the case of a
 money judgment, the information necessary to compute the amount of the judgment as renewed. In the case of a judgment for possession or sale of property, a description of the performance remaining due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 176, Sec. 1.   (SB 551)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

683.150.

(a) Upon the filing of the application, the court clerk shall enter the renewal of the judgment in the court records.

(b) The fee for filing an application for renewal of judgment is as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 70626 of the Government Code.

(c) In the case of a money judgment, the entry of renewal shall show the amount of the judgment as renewed. Except as provided
 in subdivisions (d) and (e), this amount is the amount required to satisfy the judgment on the date of the filing of the application for renewal and includes the fee for the filing of the application for renewal.

(d) In the case of a money judgment payable in installments not previously renewed, the amount of the judgment as renewed is the total of the past due installments, the costs added to the judgment pursuant to Section 685.090, and the accrued interest, which remains unsatisfied and is enforceable on the date of the filing of the application for renewal and includes the fee for the filing of the application for renewal.

(e) In the case of a money judgment payable in installments previously renewed, the amount of the judgment as renewed under the latest renewal is the total of the following which remains unsatisfied and is enforceable on the date of the filing of the
 application for the latest renewal:

(1) The amount of the judgment as renewed under the previous renewal.

(2) The past due installments that became due and payable after the previous renewal.

(3) The costs that have been added to the judgment pursuant to Section 685.090 after the previous renewal.

(4) The interest that has accrued on the amounts described in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) since the last renewal.

(5) The fee for filing the application for renewal.

(f) In the case of a judgment for possession or sale of property, the entry of renewal shall describe the performance remaining due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 75, Sec. 36.   Effective July 19, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 156 of Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

683.160.

(a) The judgment creditor shall serve a notice of renewal of the judgment on the judgment debtor. Service shall be made personally or by first-class mail and proof of service shall be filed with the court clerk. The notice shall be in a form prescribed by the Judicial Council and shall inform the judgment debtor that the judgment debtor has 60 days within which to make a motion to vacate or modify the renewal.

(b) Until proof of service is filed pursuant to subdivision (a), no writ may be issued, nor may any enforcement proceedings be commenced to enforce the judgment, except to the extent that the judgment would be enforceable had it not been
 renewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 883, Sec. 4.   (SB 1200)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

683.170.

(a) The renewal of a judgment pursuant to this article may be vacated on any ground that would be a defense to an action on the judgment, including the ground that the amount of the renewed judgment as entered pursuant to this article is incorrect, and shall be vacated if the application for renewal was filed within five years from the time the judgment was previously renewed under this article.

(b) Not later than 60 days after service of the notice of renewal pursuant to Section 683.160, the judgment debtor may apply by noticed motion under this section for an order of the court vacating the renewal of the judgment. The notice of motion shall be
 served on the judgment creditor. Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(c) Upon the hearing of the motion, the renewal may be ordered vacated upon any ground provided in subdivision (a), and another and different renewal may be entered, including, but not limited to, the renewal of the judgment in a different amount if the decision of the court is that the judgment creditor is entitled to renewal in a different amount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 883, Sec. 5.   (SB 1200)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

683.180.

(a) If a judgment lien on an interest in real property has been created pursuant to a money judgment and the judgment is renewed pursuant to this article, the duration of the judgment lien is extended until 10 years from the date of the filing of the application for renewal if, before the expiration of the judgment lien, a certified copy of the application for renewal is recorded with the county recorder of the county where the real property subject to the judgment lien is located.

(b) A judgment lien on an interest in real property
 that has been transferred subject to the lien is not extended pursuant to subdivision (a) if the transfer was recorded before the application for renewal was filed unless both of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) A copy of the application for renewal is personally served on the transferee.

(2) Proof of such service is filed with the court clerk within 90 days after the filing of the application for renewal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 155, Sec. 9.5.   Effective June 30, 1983.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

683.190.
